Utah statutes.
58-37c-7.   Controlled substance precursor license.
(1)  The division shall issue to persons qualified under the provisions of
this chapter and rules adopted pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, a controlled substance precursor license.
(2)  It is unlawful for a person to engage in the distribution, sale, or
transfer, or in the purchase or obtaining of a controlled substance precursor
in a regulated transaction without being licensed or excepted from licensure
under this chapter.
